Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 16. Egg Board.

§ 3.2-1600.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Eggs for consumption”
means eggs that are actually consumed in Virginia or sold at a location in Virginia.

“Eggs for use”
means eggs that are incorporated into another product at a Virginia location so as to lose their character as eggs.

“Handler”
means any person who operates a grading station, a packer, distributor, or other person who purchases, sells, or handles eggs that are used at the wholesale level for consumption in Virginia or, a farmer who packs, processes, or otherwise performs the functions of a handler. The term shall also mean any person in Virginia who purchases eggs, or the liquid equivalent thereof, from anyone other than a registered handler for use or consumption at wholesale in the Commonwealth. The functions of a handler include the sale, distribution, or other disposition of eggs at the wholesale level for use or consumption in Virginia regardless of where the eggs were produced or purchased.

“Registered handler”
means any person who has registered with the Tax Commissioner to receive monthly return forms and report the egg tax.

History.

1980, c. 316, § 3.1-796.11:4; 1982, c. 172; 1984, c. 550; 1993, c. 809; 2008, c. 860.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Food, § 3.

§ 3.2-1601.
Egg Board; composition and appointment of members.

The Egg Board is continued within the Department. The Egg Board shall be composed of seven members appointed by the Governor and confirmed in accordance with §

2.2-107

from nominations submitted to him by the Virginia Egg Council or any other organization that represents persons who are involved in the commercial egg industry in the Commonwealth.

The Virginia Egg Council or other organization shall provide nominations for each available position before the expiration of the member’s term for which the nominations are being provided. If the Virginia Egg Council fails to provide nominations for each available position, the Governor may appoint to such available position another person who is involved in the commercial egg industry.

History.

1980, c. 316, § 3.1-796.11:2; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 691, 714; 2016, c. 565.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and added the second paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 565 inserted “or any other organization that represents persons who are involved in the commercial egg industry in the Commonwealth” in the first paragraph and in the second paragraph inserted “or other organization” and deleted “two or more,” following “shall provide” and “at least 30 days” preceding “before the expiration” in the first sentence, deleted “at least two” following “fails to provide,” and “at least 30 days before the expiration date pursuant to this section” preceding “the Governor may” in the last sentence.

§§ 3.2-1602,
3.2-1603.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 565, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

3.2-1602

and 3.2-1603, relating to Egg Board membership terms and officers and their compensation, were derived from Acts 1980, c. 316, § 3.1-796.11:2; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1604.
Powers and duties of Egg Board.

The Egg Board shall have charge of the management and expenditures of the Virginia Egg Fund established in the state treasury.

The Egg Board may expend funds to provide for programs of research, education, publicity, advertising, and other promotion of eggs that are the subject of the tax levy; manage the Virginia Egg Fund so as to accumulate a reserve for contingencies; establish an office and employ such technical, professional, and other assistants as may be required; contract for research, publicity, advertising, and other promotional services; and take measures to strengthen and promote the best interest of farmers producing eggs on which the tax has been levied in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The Egg Board may establish an executive committee and charge it with such powers, duties, and functions as the Egg Board deems proper.

The chairman of the Egg Board shall make a report at each annual meeting of the Egg Board and furnish the members of the Egg Board with a statement of the total receipts and disbursements for the year. He shall file a copy of the report with the Commissioner and make copies of the report available for publication.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall audit the accounts of the Egg Board as provided for in § 30-133.

History.

1980, c. 316, § 3.1-796.11:2; 1985, c. 448; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1605.
Virginia Egg Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Egg Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys levied and collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes set out in this chapter.

In carrying out the purposes of this article, the Egg Board may cooperate with other state, regional, and national agricultural organizations in research, education, publicity, advertising, and other promotional activities.

Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the Egg Board on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the duly authorized officer of the Egg Board.

History.

1980, c. 316, §§ 3.1-796.11:8, 3.1-796.11:9; 1993, c. 809; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1606.
Levy of tax; regulations; exemptions.

There is hereby levied on eggs purchased or sold for use or consumption in the Commonwealth an excise tax of five cents ($0.05) per 30-dozen case or, if the eggs are purchased or sold in other than shell form, 11 cents ($0.11) per 100 pounds of liquid eggs or liquid equivalent. Such excise tax shall be levied only once. The Tax Commissioner, with the advice and consent of the Egg Board, may adopt regulations as are necessary for the interpretation, administration, and enforcement of this tax.

The following categories of eggs shall be exempt from the tax levied pursuant to this chapter:

The eggs of any producer selling fewer than 500 cases (15,000 dozen), or the liquid equivalent thereof, per year.

Eggs when sold between registered handlers.The Tax Commissioner shall provide a mechanism for returning taxes paid by exempt persons.

History.

1980, c. 316, § 3.1-796.11:3; 1982, c. 172; 1985, c. 173; 1993, c. 809; 2008, c. 860; 2016, c. 565.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 565 inserted subsection A designation and added subsection B.

§ 3.2-1607.
Collection and disposition of tax by handler; reports.

Every handler shall collect the tax imposed by this chapter from the person who purchases eggs for use or consumption in the Commonwealth and shall remit the tax to the Tax Commissioner by the 20th day of each month.

Every handler shall complete reports on forms furnished by the Tax Commissioner and submit the reports to the Tax Commissioner together with the tax submitted pursuant to subsection A. Each report shall include a statement of the gross volume of taxed eggs that have been packed, processed, purchased, sold, or handled by the handler. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

58.1-3

, upon request, the Tax Commissioner shall provide to the Commissioner or the Egg Board copies of reports submitted pursuant to this section.

Every person who engages in business in the Commonwealth as a handler shall register, collect, and pay the tax on all eggs sold or delivered to anyone other than a registered handler for storage, use, or consumption in the Commonwealth. Such handlers shall maintain a certificate of registration, file returns, and perform all other duties required of handlers.

Any tax that is not paid when due shall be collected pursuant to §

3.2-1102

.

Every handler shall keep a complete record of the eggs subject to the provisions of this chapter that are packed, processed, or handled by him and shall preserve such records for a period of not less than three years from the time the eggs were packed, processed, or handled. Such records shall be open for inspection by the Tax Commissioner and shall be established and maintained as required by the Tax Commissioner.

History.

1980, c. 316, § 3.1-796.11:4; 1982, c. 172; 1984, c. 550; 1993, c. 809; 2008, c. 860; 2016, c. 565.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 565, in subsection B, substituted “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

58.1-3

, upon request, the” for “A copy of the completed report shall simultaneously be filed with the Egg Board. The,” “shall provide to the Commissioner or” for “may disclose to the duly authorized officer of,” and “copies of reports submitted pursuant to this section” for “tax information relating to the egg tax”; and added subsection E.

§§ 3.2-1608,
3.2-1609.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 565, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

3.2-1608

and 3.2-1609, relating to exemptions from the egg tax and records to be kept by handlers, was derived from Acts 1980, c. 316, §§ 3.1-796.11:5, 3.1-796.11.6; 1993, c. 809; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1610.
Falsification of records; misdemeanor.

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor:

For any handler knowingly to report falsely to the Tax Commissioner the quantity of shell or processed eggs handled by him during any period.

For any handler to falsify the records of the eggs processed, packed, or handled by him.

For any handler to fail to maintain a complete record of the eggs processed, packed, or handled by him for at least three years from the time such eggs are processed, packed, or handled.

History.

1980, c. 316, § 3.1-796.11:10; 1993, c. 809; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.